Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 8
MISCELLANEOUS

32-11-801. Budgets, accounts, and audits.

The district shall adopt a budget for each fiscal year, shall maintain accounts, and shall cause an annual audit to be made pertaining to the financial affairs of the district as respectively provided in the local government budget law of Colorado, the Colorado local government uniform accounting law, and the Colorado local government audit law, as from time to time amended, except as otherwise provided in this article.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 760, § 32.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-32.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 289, § 66, effective June 29.

Cross references:

For the local government budget law, see part 1 of article 1 of title 29; for the local government uniform accounting law, see part 5 of article 1 of title 29; for the local government audit law, see part 6 of article 1 of title 29.

32-11-802. Effect of extraterritorial functions.

All of the powers, privileges, immunities, rights, exemptions from laws, ordinances, and rules, all pension, relief, disability, workers' compensation, and other benefits which apply to the activity of officers, agents, or employees of the district or any such public body when performing their respective functions within the territorial limits of the respective public agencies shall apply to them to the same degree and extent while engaged in the performance of any of their extraterritorial functions and duties under this article.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 762, § 35.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-35.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 573, § 68, effective July 1.

32-11-803. Early hearings.

All cases in which there may arise a question of validity of any power granted in this article or of any other provision of this article shall be advanced as a matter of immediate public interest and concern and shall be heard at the earliest practicable moment.

The courts shall be open at all times for the purposes of this article.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 811, § 193.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-193.

32-11-804. Decision of board final.

The action and decision of the board proceeding under this article as to all matters passed upon by the board in relation to any action, matter, or thing provided in this article shall be final and conclusive in the absence of fraud.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 811, § 194.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-194.

32-11-805. Correction of faulty notices.

In any case where a notice is provided for in this article, if the board or the court finds for any reason that due notice was not given, the board or the court shall not thereby lose jurisdiction, and the proceeding in question shall not thereby be void or abated; but the board or court shall order due notice to be given and shall continue any hearing until such time as notice is properly given, and thereupon shall proceed as though notice has been properly given in the first instance.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 811, § 195.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-195.

32-11-806. Correction of errors in proceedings.

It is the duty of the board, and it shall have the power by any subsequent proceedings, to correct any mistakes, errors, or irregularities in any of the proceedings mentioned in this article.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 811, § 196.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-196.

32-11-807. Retention of jurisdiction.

The board may continue the hearing upon any petition or resolution or remonstrance provided for in this article and shall retain jurisdiction until the same is fully disposed of.

The board shall not lose jurisdiction over the acquiring or improving, or acquiring and improving, of any project, the levy of any taxes, assessments, or service charges, or the issuance of any securities or any other matter provided for in this article by reason of any adjournment or any delays, errors, mistakes, or irregularities on the part of any director or any district officer or any other person.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 811, § 197.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-197.

32-11-808. Conclusiveness of board's determination.

The determination of the board that the limitations imposed in this article upon the issuance of bonds or upon the issuance of other securities under this article, both general obligations and special obligations, have been met shall be conclusive in the absence of fraud or arbitrary and gross abuse of discretion, regardless of whether the authorizing resolution or the securities thereby authorized contain a recital as authorized by section 32-11-507.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 812, § 198.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-198.

32-11-809. Investments by public bodies.

It is legal for any public entity, as defined in section 24-75-601 (1), C.R.S., to invest any permanent state funds or other funds available for investment in any of the bonds or other securities authorized to be issued pursuant to the provisions of this article if the securities satisfy the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 812, § 199.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-199.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1131, § 72, effective July 1.

32-11-810. Investments by other persons.

It is legal for any bank, trust company, banker, savings bank or institution, any building and loan association, savings and loan association, investment company, and any other person (other than a public body) carrying on a banking or investment business, any insurance company, insurance association, or any other person (other than a public body) carrying on an insurance business, and any executor, administrator, curator, trustee, or any other fiduciary to invest funds or moneys in their custody in any of the bonds or other securities issued in accordance with the provisions of this article.

Nothing contained in this section with regard to legal investments shall be construed as relieving any representative of any corporation or other person of any duty of exercising reasonable care in selecting securities.

It is legal for any securities issued under this article which are general obligation bonds or other general obligation securities or are special assessment bonds or other special assessment securities, the payment of which is additionally secured as required by section 32-11-628 and as permitted by section 32-11-629, to be accepted and held as security for the prompt payment of any public deposits of the state, any agency, instrumentality, or corporation thereof, or any county, city, town, school district, or other political subdivision thereof, including without limitation any quasi-municipal district or any authority.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 812, § 200.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-200.

32-11-811. Delegated powers.

The officers of the urban district and of each county in which the district is located are authorized to take all action necessary or appropriate to effectuate the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 816, § 207.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-207.

32-11-812. Confirmation of contract proceedings.

In its discretion, the board may file a petition at any time in the district court in and for any county in which the urban district is located, praying for a judicial examination and determination of any power conferred, or of any securities issued or merely authorized to be issued, or of any taxes, assessments, or service charges levied or otherwise made or contracted to be levied or otherwise made, or of any other act, proceeding, or contract of the district, whether or not such act, proceeding, or contract has been taken or executed, including proposed contracts for any project, proposed securities of the district to defray wholly or in part the cost of the project, and the proposed acquisition, improvement, equipment, maintenance, operation, or disposal of any property pertaining thereto (or any combination thereof).

Such petition shall:

Set forth the facts whereon the validity of such power, securities, taxes, assessments, charges, act, proceeding, or contract is founded; and

Be verified by the chairman of the board.

Such action shall be in the nature of a proceeding in rem, and jurisdiction of all parties interested may be had by publication and posting, as provided in this article.

Notice of the filing of the petition shall be given by the clerk of the court, under the seal thereof, stating in brief outline the contents of the petition and showing where a full copy of any proceeding or contract therein mentioned may be examined.

The notice shall be served:

By publication at least once a week for five consecutive weeks by five weekly insertions, in at least:

A newspaper of general circulation published in the city and county of Denver; and

A newspaper of general circulation published in each of the counties of Adams, Arapahoe, Boulder, and Jefferson;

By posting in the office of the district at least thirty days prior to the date fixed in the notice for the hearing on the petition.

Jurisdiction shall be complete after such publication and posting.

Any owner of property in the district or any other person interested in the proceeding or contract or proposed proceeding or proposed contract or in the premises may appear and move to dismiss or answer the petition at any time prior to the date fixed for the hearing or within such further time as may be allowed by the court. The petition shall be taken as confessed by all persons who fail so to appear.

The petition and notice shall be sufficient to give the court jurisdiction, and upon hearing the court shall examine into and determine all matters and things affecting the question submitted, shall make such findings with reference thereto, and shall render such judgment and decree thereon as the case warrants.

Costs may be divided or apportioned among any contesting parties in the discretion of the trial court.

Review of the judgment of the court may be had as in other similar cases, except that such review must be applied for within thirty days after the time of the rendition of such judgment or within such additional time as may be allowed by the court within the thirty days.

The Colorado rules of civil procedure shall govern in matters of pleading and practice where not otherwise specified in this article.

The court shall disregard any error, irregularity, or omission which does not affect the substantial rights of the parties.

All cases in which there may arise a question of the validity of any matter provided for under this section shall be advanced as a matter of immediate public interest and concern and shall be heard at the earliest practicable moment.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 816, § 208.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-208.

32-11-813. Tax exemptions.

The effectuation of the powers authorized in this article are in all respects for the benefit of the people of the state, for the improvement of their health and living conditions, and for the increase of their commerce and prosperity.

The urban district shall not be required to pay any taxes upon any property pertaining to the facilities of the district or any project authorized in this article and acquired within the state, nor the district's interest in any such property.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 817, § 209.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-209.

32-11-814. Freedom from judicial process.

Execution or other judicial process shall not issue against any property of the district authorized in this article, nor shall any judgment against the district be a charge or lien upon its property.

Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to or limit the right of the holder or owner of any district securities, his trustee, or any assignee of all or part of this interest, the federal government when it is a party to any contract with the district, and any other obligee under this article to foreclose, otherwise to enforce, and to pursue any remedies for the enforcement of any pledge or lien given by the district on the proceeds of any taxes, assessments, pledged revenues, or any other moneys of the district or any combination thereof.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 817, § 210.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-210.

32-11-815. Misdemeanors.

Any person who wrongfully or purposely fills up, cuts, damages, injures, or destroys or in any manner impairs the usefulness of the facilities of the district or any property pertaining to any project, or any part thereof, or any other work, structure, improvement, equipment, or other property acquired under the provisions of this article 11, or wrongfully and maliciously interferes with any officer, agent, or employee of the district in the proper discharge of the officer's, agent's, or employee's duties, commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 817, § 211.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-211.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3258, § 548, effective March 1, 2022.

32-11-816. Civil rights.

If the urban district is damaged by any act referred to in section 32-11-815, the district may also bring a civil action for damages sustained by any such act, and in such proceeding the prevailing party shall also be entitled to reasonable attorneys' fees and costs of court.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 817, § 212.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-212.

32-11-817. Exemption of district.

A district formed under this article shall not be considered a political subdivision for the purposes of section 8-3-104 (12), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 818, § 213.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-213.

Cross references:

For the labor peace act, see article 3 of title 8.